Illinois, session 104th, SB72.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 5adding Section 246 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 5/246 new)7    Sec. 246. College tuition expense credit.8    (a) For taxable years ending on or after December 31, 92025, a taxpayer who may claim one or more qualifying students 10as a dependent shall be allowed a credit up to $2,000 against 11the tax imposed by subsections (a) and (b) of this Section for 12qualified tuition and fee expenses paid by the taxpayer during 13the taxable year on behalf of the qualifying student or 14students.15    (b) In no event shall a credit under this Section reduce a 16taxpayer's liability to less than zero. If the amount of 17credit exceeds the tax liability for the year, the excess may 18be carried and applied to the tax liability for the 5 taxable 19years following the excess credit year. The tax credit shall 20be applied to the earliest year for which there is a tax 21liability. If there are credits for more than one year that are 22available to offset liability, the earlier credit shall be 23applied first.  SB0072- 2 -LRB104 06899 HLH 16935 b1    (c) For the purpose of this Section:2    "Qualifying college or university" means any public or 3private university, community college, vocational school, or 4other postsecondary educational institution that is physically 5located in the State and is eligible to participate in a 6student loan program administered by the United States 7Department of Education. 8    "Qualifying student" means an individual who (i) is a 9resident of the State, (ii) is under the age of 24 at the close 10of the school year for which a credit is sought, and (iii) 11during the school year for which a credit is sought, is a 12full-time student enrolled in a program at a qualifying 13college or university at which the student is enrolled. 14    "Qualified tuition and fee expense" means the amount 15incurred by on behalf of a qualifying student for tuition, 16book fees, and lab fees at the qualifying college of 17university at which the student is enrolled.18    (d) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no 19taxpayer may claim a credit under this Section if the 20taxpayer's adjusted gross income for the taxable year exceeds 21(i) $250,000, in the case of spouses filing a joint federal tax 22return or (ii) $125,000, in the case of all other taxpayers.23    (e) This Section is exempt from the provisions of Section 24250.  25    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 26becoming law.